Utah statutes.
31A-41-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Title and Escrow Commission created in Section 31A-2-403.

(2)  "Fund" means the Title Insurance Recovery, Education, and Research Fund created in Section 31A-41-201.

(3)  "Title insurance licensee" means:

(a)  an agency title insurance producer; or

(b)  an individual title insurance producer.



Amended by Chapter 319, 2013 General Session

